Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2483
Bondholders; pledge; agreement of the state.

The State of Nebraska does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds and with those parties who may enter into contracts with any agency or municipality under sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 that the state will not alter, impair, or limit the rights thereby vested until the bonds, together with applicable interest, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed. Nothing contained in sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall preclude such alteration, impairment, or limitation if and when adequate provisions shall be made by law for the protection of the holders of the bonds or persons entering into contracts with any agency or municipality. Each agency and municipality is authorized to include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds or contracts.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 83.